Utah statutes.
9-4-632.   Provisions controlling -- Acts of governmental bodies deemed
administrative.
The provisions of this part shall be controlling, notwithstanding anything to
the contrary in any other law of this state, city charter, or local ordinance.
Any action of a city or county or governing body in carrying out the purposes
of this part, whether by resolution, ordinance, or otherwise, shall be
considered administrative in character, and no public notice or publication
need be made with respect to that action.
